lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių priedai > Kompiuterių gaubtai ir apvalkalai: Kompiuterių korpusų uždangalai; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių kietieji dėklai; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių plėvelės ir apvalkalai; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių įmautės; Monitorių uždangalai
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Accessoires pour ordinateurs > Coques et skins pour ordinateurs: Housses pour tour d’ordinateur; Coques rigides pour ordinateur portable; Habillages et films pour ordinateur portable; Housses pour ordinateur portable; Housses pour moniteur
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Accesorii calculatoare > Carcase și skinuri pentru computere: Huse pentru unitatea centrală; Carcase rigide pentru laptop; Skinuri și folii pentru laptop; Huse pentru laptop; Huse pentru monitoare
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Accessori per computer > Cover e protezioni per computer: Copri tower per computer; Custodie rigide per laptop; Pelli e involucri del laptop; Custodie per laptop; Copri monitor
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机配件 > 计算机保护套/保护罩: 电脑机箱罩; 笔记本电脑硬壳; 笔记本电脑贴膜/保护膜; 笔记本电脑内胆包; 显示器罩
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeraccessoires > Computertassen en -hoezen: Computerbehuizing hoezen; Laptop hardcases; Laptop skins en wraps; Laptop hoezen; Monitorhoezen
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC周辺機器 > PCカバー・ケース: コンピュータータワー用カバー; ノートパソコンハードケース; ノートパソコンスキン・ラップ; ノートパソコンスリーブ; モニターカバー
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Dodatna oprema za računala > Navlake i maske za računala: Zaštite za kućišta računala; Tvrde torbe za prijenosna računala; Folije i obloge za prijenosna računala; Navlake za prijenosna računala; Zaštite za monitore
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Accessories > Computer Covers & Skins: Computer Tower Covers; Laptop Hard Cases; Laptop Skins & Wraps; Laptop Sleeves; Monitor Covers
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Akcesoria komputerowe > Pokrowce i futerały na komputery: Pokrowce na obudowy komputerowe; Twarde etui na laptopa; Folie i okleiny na laptopa; Pokrowiec (rękaw) na laptopa; Pokrowce na monitory
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Accesorios informáticos > Fundas para computadoras: Fundas para torre de computadora; Estuches rígidos para portátil; Protectores y envolturas para portátil; Fundas para portátil; Fundas para monitor
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦配件 > 電腦保護殼/保護套: 電腦主機保護罩; 筆電硬殼; 筆電貼膜與包膜; 筆電內袋; 螢幕保護罩
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítače – příslušenství > Obaly a pouzdra na počítače: Kryty na počítačové věže; Pevné pouzdra na notebooky; Obaly a polepy na notebooky; Pouzdra na notebooky; Kryty na monitory
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные аксессуары > Декоративные чехлы и наклейки для компьютеров: Чехлы для компьютерных корпусов; Жесткие чехлы для ноутбуков; Наклейки и обложки для ноутбуков; Чехлы для ноутбуков; Чехлы для мониторов
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerzubehör > Computer-Schutzhüllen: Computerturm-Abdeckungen; Laptop-Hartschalen; Laptop-Skins und -Folien; Laptop-Hüllen; Monitor-Abdeckungen
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové príslušenstvo > Počítačové kryty a obaly: Kryty počítačových skríň; Tvrdé puzdra na notebooky; Nálepky a obaly na notebooky; Púzdra na notebooky; Kryty monitorov
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни аксесоари > Компютърни калъфи и покрития: Покрития за компютърна кутия; Твърди калъфи за лаптоп; Обвивки и облепки за лаптоп; Калъфи за лаптоп; Покрития за монитор
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Kılıfları: Bilgisayar Kule Kapakları; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Sert Kılıfları; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Kaplamaları ve Sargıları; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Kılıfları; Monitör Kapakları
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Acessórios de computador > Capas e proteções de computador: Capas para torre de computador; Estojos rígidos para portátil; Skins e películas para portátil; Capas para portátil; Capas para monitor
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 커버: 컴퓨터 타워 커버; 노트북 하드 케이스; 노트북 스킨 및 랩; 노트북 슬리브; 모니터 커버
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện máy tính > Vỏ/bao máy tính: Vỏ bảo vệ tháp máy tính; Vỏ cứng laptop; Da và vỏ bọc laptop; Túi laptop; Vỏ bảo vệ màn hình
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datortillbehör > Datorskal och -fodral: Datorchassiskydd; Hårda fodral för bärbara datorer; Skins och omslag för bärbara datorer; Fodral för bärbara datorer; Skärmskydd
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniška oprema > Računalniški ovitki in prevleke: Pokrovi za računalniške omare; Trdi etuiji za prenosnike; Ovitki za prenosnike; Torbice za prenosnike; Pokrovi za monitorje
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์คอมพิวเตอร์ > ปกแล็ปท็อปและแท็บเล็ต: ฝาครอบเคสคอมพิวเตอร์; เคสแข็งสำหรับแล็ปท็อป; สกินและแผ่นหุ้มแล็ปท็อป; ซองใส่แล็ปท็อป; ฝาครอบจอมอนิเตอร์
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Tilbehør til datamaskiner > Deksler og trekk til datamaskin: Datamaskintårndeksler; Harde etuier til bærbar datamaskin; Trekk og folier til bærbar datamaskin; Etuier til bærbare datamaskiner; Skjermdeksler
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computer – tilbehør > Computercovers: Dæksler til computertårne; Hårde etuier til bærbare computere; Skins og wraps til bærbare computere; Sleeves til bærbare computere; Skærmovertræk
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Acessórios para computadores > Estojos e capas para computador: Capas para gabinete de computador; Cases rígidos para notebook; Skins e adesivos para notebook; Capas para notebook; Capas para monitor
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonetarvikkeet > Tietokoneen suojakotelot ja -pussit: Tietokonetornin suojat; Kannettavien kovakuoret; Kannettavien suojapinnat ja -kalvot; Kannettavien suojakuoret; Näytönsuojat
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ υπολογιστών > Καλύμματα & προστατευτικά αξεσουάρ (skins) υπολογιστών: Καλύμματα πύργων υπολογιστών; Σκληρές θήκες για φορητούς υπολογιστές; Skins για φορητούς υπολογιστές; Θήκες για φορητούς υπολογιστές; Καλύμματα οθονών
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-kiegészítők > Számítógép-huzatok és -borítók: Számítógépház-burkolatok; Laptop-keménytokok; Laptop-borítások és -fóliák; Laptop-tokok; Monitorburkolatok